Maryland, session 2025, HB1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–6A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Rehabilitation practitioner” means an individual who provides
vocational rehabilitation services.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1404*

HOUSE BILL 1404
(2) “Rehabilitation practitioner” includes:
(i) a nurse certified by the State Board of Nursing as a nurse case
manager;
(ii) a rehabilitation counselor; [and]
(iii) a vocational evaluator; AND
(IV) A LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL.
9–6A–04.
(a) This subtitle does not limit the right of any individual to engage in a health
occupation that the individual otherwise is authorized to engage in under the Health
Occupations Article.
(b) The Commission has the authority to adopt and enforce rules and regulations
regarding the standards of practice of rehabilitation counselors and vocational evaluators.
(c) Violation of the rules and regulations adopted or enforced by the Commission,
THE STATE BOARD OF SOCIAL WORK EXAMINERS, or the State Board of Nursing in
accordance with this title by a rehabilitation practitioner shall be grounds for denial of a
registration to any applicant, or suspension or revocation of a registrant’s registration
pursuant to §§ 9–6A–15 and 9–6A–16 of this subtitle.
9–6A–09.
(d) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LICENSED CERTIFIED
SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section:
[(1)] (I) a rehabilitation counselor who has met the education
requirements under subsection (b)(1) or (2) of this section to qualify for registration shall
work under the administrative supervision of a certified rehabilitation counselor, certified
vocational evaluator, certified disability management specialist, certified case manager, or
certified rehabilitation registered nurse; and
[(2)] (II) a vocational evaluator who has met the education requirements
under subsection (c)(1) or (2) of this section shall work under the administrative supervision
of a certified vocational evaluator, certified rehabilitation counselor, certified disability
management specialist, certified case manager, or certified rehabilitation registered nurse.

HOUSE BILL 1404 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.